Ohio, session 136, HB409.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That section 102.031 of the Revised Code be 5
amended to read as follows: 6
Sec. 102.031. (A) As used in this section: 7
(1) "Business associate" means a person with whom a member 8
of the general assembly is conducting or undertaking a financial 9
transaction. 10
(2) "Contribution" has the same meaning as in section 11
3517.01 of the Revised Code. 12
(3) "Employee" does not include a member of the general 13
assembly whose nonlegislative position of employment does not 14
involve the performance of or the authority to perform 15
administrative or supervisory functions; or whose nonlegislative 16
position of employment, if the member is a public employee, does 17
not involve a substantial and material exercise of 18
administrative discretion in the formulation of public policy, 19

H. B. No. 409 Page 2
As Introduced
expenditure of public funds, enforcement of laws and rules of 20
the state or a county or city, or execution of other public 21
trusts. 22
(4) "Professional sporting event" means a sporting or 23
athletic event played by a team that is a member of the national 24
football league, the national hockey league, major league 25
baseball, major league soccer, or the national basketball 26
association. 27
(B) No member of the general assembly shall vote on any 28
legislation that the member knows is then being actively 29
advocated if the member is one of the following with respect to 30
a legislative agent or employer that is then actively advocating 31
on that legislation: 32
(1) An employee; 33
(2) A business associate; 34
(3) A person, other than an employee, who is hired under 35
contract to perform certain services, and that position involves 36
a substantial and material exercise of administrative discretion 37
in the formulation of public policy. 38
(C) No member of the general assembly shall knowingly 39
accept any of the following from a legislative agent or a person 40
required to file a statement described in division (A)(2) of 41
section 102.021 of the Revised Code: 42
(1) The payment of any expenses for travel or lodging 43
except as otherwise authorized by division (H) of section 102.03 44
of the Revised Code; 45
(2) More than seventy-five dollars aggregated per calendar 46
year as payment for meals and other food and beverages, other 47

H. B. No. 409 Page 3
As Introduced
than for those meals and other food and beverages provided to 48
the member at a meeting at which the member participates in a 49
panel, seminar, or speaking engagement, at a meeting or 50
convention of a national organization to which any state agency, 51
including, but not limited to, any legislative agency or state 52
institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 53
of the Revised Code, pays membership dues, or at a dinner, 54
party, or function to which all members of the general assembly 55
or all members of either house of the general assembly are 56
invited; 57
(3) A gift of any amount in the form of cash or the 58
equivalent of cash, or a gift of any other thing of value whose 59
value exceeds seventy-five dollars. As used in division (C)(3) 60
of this section, "gift" does not include any contribution or any 61
gifts of meals and other food and beverages or the payment of 62
expenses incurred for travel to destinations either inside or 63
outside this state that is received by a member of the general 64
assembly and that is incurred in connection with the member's 65
official duties. 66
(D) It is not a violation of division (C)(2) of this 67
section if, within sixty days after receiving notice from a 68
legislative agent that the legislative agent has provided a 69
member of the general assembly with more than seventy-five 70
dollars aggregated in a calendar year as payment for meals and 71
other food and beverages, the member of the general assembly 72
returns to that legislative agent the amount received that 73
exceeds seventy-five dollars. 74
(E) No member of the general assembly shall knowingly 75
accept a free or discounted ticket to a professional sporting 76
event, unless the free or discounted ticket is given or sold as 77

H. B. No. 409 Page 4
As Introduced
part of a promotion generally available to the public, and on 78
the same terms as generally available to the public. 79
(F) The joint legislative ethics committee may impose a 80
fine of not more than one thousand dollars upon a member of the 81
general assembly who violates division divisions (B) or (E) of 82
this section. 83
Section 2. That existing section 102.031 of the Revised 84
Code is hereby repealed. 85